District of Columbia statutes.
20-901

Claim not paid in normal course of administration.

No proceeding to enforce a claim against a decedent’s estate may be revived or commenced before the appointment of a personal representative. After appointment, and until the estate is closed, the procedures prescribed by this chapter shall be followed. After the estate is closed, a creditor whose claim has not been barred may recover directly from the persons to whom property has been distributed as provided in sections 20-1302 and 20-1303 or from a personal representative individually as provided in section 20-1303 .

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-901.